Hawaii, session 2026, SB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State of Hawaii
utilizes the regular system and the land court to record legal
documents pertaining to the ownership of property. In general,
property is recorded in either the regular system or the land
court; however, in some circumstances property is recorded in
both systems. The regular system and the land court have
different requirements for recording documents. The land court
creates barriers to access in the form of delay and increased
expenses resulting from the complicated procedures and
requirements in the land court. No new properties have been
registered in the land court since 1989, which indicates sharp
public preference for the regular system.
The legislature further finds that the regular system is a
"race-notice" land registration system and does not make any
independent determination about the priority or ownership of
interests in the property. This is one of the reasons why the
regular system is preferred by the public. On the other hand,
SB LRB 25-0338.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.Q4
the land court system is a "Torrens" system of land
registration, which means one must "race" to the land court to
record a document ahead of another possible prior claimant to
the property.
The legislature also finds that Act 120, Session laws of
Hawaii 2009, amended chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in an
attempt to ease the backlog in the bureau of conveyances. Among
other things, the amendments allowed owners of interest in land
registered in the land court system to transfer the interest to
the regular system.
The purpose of this Act is to simplify the land
registration process by repealing the land court system and
transitioning all recorded documents to the regular system.
SECTION 2. Starting on January 1, , no new
applications for registration of title shall be made in the land
court.
SECTION 3. No later than December 31, , all registered
owners of an interest in property registered in the land court
shall initiate deregistration of the property pursuant to part
II of chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
SB LRB 25-0338.docx 2
IDIHIIIIIIIIHmillllll

Page 3 S.B. NO.O—
SECTION 4. The land court shall inform all registered
owners of any interest in property registered in land court'of
the requirement under section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 5. The subpart entitled "Land Court; Personnel",
of chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes, consisting of sections
501-1 to 501-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed.
SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the land court to inform registered owners of any
interest in property registered in land court of the requirement
for deregistration of property.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the land court
for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 7. All rights, powers, functions, and duties of
the land court are transferred to the bureau of conveyances.
All employees who occupy civil service positions and whose
functions are transferred to the bureau of conveyances by this
Act shall retain their civil service status, whether permanent
or temporary. Employees shall be transferred without loss of
SB LRB 25-0338.docx
IMHuM"mnu

Page 4 S.B. NO.O—
salary, seniority (except as prescribed by applicable collective
bargaining agreements), retention points, prior service credit,
any vacation and sick leave credits previously earned, and other
rights, benefits, and privileges, in accordance with state
personnel laws and this Act; provided that the employees possess
the minimum qualifications and public employment requirements
for the class or position to which transferred or appointed, as
applicable; provided further that subsequent changes in status
may be made pursuant to applicable civil service and
compensation laws.
Any employee who, prior to this Act, is exempt from civil
service and is transferred as a consequence of this Act may
retain the employee's exempt status, but shall not be appointed
to a civil service position as a consequence of this Act. An
exempt employee who is transferred by this Act shall not suffer
any loss of prior service credit, vacation or sick leave credits
previously earned, or other employee benefits or privileges as a
consequence of this Act; provided that the employees possess
legal and public employment requirements for the position to
which transferred or appointed, as applicable; provided further
that subsequent changes in status may be made pursuant to
SB LRB 25-0338.docx
MIIHEHI

Page 5 S.B. NO.C
applicable employment and compensation laws. The chairperson of
the board of land ad natural resources may prescribe the duties
and qualifications of these employees and fix their salaries
without regard to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
SECTION 8. All appropriations, records, equipment,
machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents,
maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used,
acquired, or held by the land court relating to the functions
transferred to the department of land and natural resources
shall be transferred with the functions to which they relate.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that sections 5, 7, and 8 shall take effect on
June 30,

INTRODUCED BY
SB LRB 25-0338.docx

S.B. NO.CH